Hindi_temp.dix
    <pardef n="bujurg/a__n">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Sahar/a__adj">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
       
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bujurg"><i>bujurg</i><par n="bujurg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Saha"><i>Saha</i><par n="Sahar/a__adj"/></e>
